Hawaii statutes.
[§231-9.7] Informalities not to invalidate
assessments, mistakes in names or notices, etc. No assessment or act
relating to the assessment or collection of taxes shall be illegal nor shall
such assessment, levy, or collection be invalid on account of mere informality
or mistakes in names, notices, etc. [L 1989, c 14, §1(6)]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next